src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num-kaksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - kakš: # quantifiers 218 'eng /est kaks/fin' - full paradigm
     kakš+Num+Sg+Nom: kakš
     kakš+Num+Sg+Gen: [kǭʼd, kǭd]
     kakš+Num+Sg+Par: [kǭʼdtõ, kǭdtõ]
     kakš+Num+Sg+Dat: [kǭʼdõn, kǭdõn]
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ins: [kǭʼdkõks, kǭdkõks]
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ill: [kǭʼdõ, kǭdõ]
     kakš+Num+Sg+Ela: [kǭʼdstõ, kǭdstõ]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Nom: [kǭʼd, kǭd]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Gen: [kǭʼd, kǭd]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Par: kakši
     kakš+Num+Pl+Dat: [kǭʼdõn, kǭdõn]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ins: [kǭʼdkõks, kǭdkõks]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ill: [kǭʼdiž, kǭdiž]
     kakš+Num+Pl+Ela: [kǭʼdšti, kǭdšti]
